Utah, session 2026, HB80.
Section 1. Section 76-11-221 is enacted to read:76-11-221. Failure to secure a firearm resulting in a minor gaining access.(1)(a)As used in this section:(i)"Locked container" means a box, case, chest, locker, safe, or similar receptacle that is secured in such a manner so as to prevent an individual from accessing the contents of the container.(ii)"Minor" means an individual under 16 years old.(b)Terms defined in Sections 76-1-101.5 and 76-11-201 apply to this section.(2)An actor commits failure to secure a firearm resulting in a minor gaining access if:(a)the actor is 18 years old or older;(b)the actor stores or leaves a loaded firearm at the actor's residence;(c)the actor knows or reasonably should know that a minor is likely to obtain possession of the loaded firearm and the minor's possession would be in violation of Section 76-11-211, Possession of a dangerous weapon by a minor;(d)the actor does not:(i)keep the loaded firearm in a locked container or in another location that a reasonable person would believe is secure; or(ii)secure the loaded firearm with a trigger lock or other device intended to prevent the use of the firearm;(e)a minor obtains possession of the loaded firearm and the minor's possession of the firearm is a violation of Section 76-11-211, Possession of a dangerous weapon by a minor; and(f)the minor described in Subsection (2)(e):(i)possesses, exhibits, or uses the firearm in a public place; or(ii)draws, exhibits, or unlawfully uses the firearm in violation of Section 76-11-207, Threatening with or using dangerous weapon in fight or quarrel.(3)A violation of Subsection (2) is class C misdemeanor.(4)An actor has an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section if the actor took reasonable precautions to ensure that the firearm was properly secured and not accessible to a minor in violation of Section 76-11-211, Possession of a dangerous weapon by a minor.(5)This section does not apply if:(a)a minor obtains a firearm as the result of an unlawful entry to the location where the firearm was located;(b)a firearm is accessed in violation of Subsection (2) but is used in a lawful act of self-defense; or(c)the actor described in Subsection (2) reports to a law enforcement officer that a minor has obtained the actor's firearm.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.